Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.060

Expense of publishing proclamations.

When the governor is authorized or required by law to issue a proclamation, payment for publishing it shall be made out of the state treasury.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.06.060. Prior: 1881 p 45 ss 1-3; Code 1881 s 2367; RRS s 10988.]